Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska17-119
Overseer of streets; duties.

The overseer of the streets shall, subject to the orders of mayor and council, have general charge, direction, and control of all work on the streets, sidewalks, culverts, and bridges of the city, and shall perform such other duties as the council may require.

Laws 1879, § 21, p. 197;

R.S.1913, § 5012;

C.S.1922, § 4181;

C.S.1929, § 17-120;

R.S.1943, § 17-119.

Cities of second class have exclusive control of streets, sidewalks, etc., must maintain them in a safe condition, and are liable for a breach of duty in respect thereto. Goodrich v. University Place, 80 Neb. 774, 115 N.W. 538 (1908).